Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 19. Miscellaneous

Livestock

§ 1. Legislature to provide for protection of livestock and stock owners.

The legislature shall pass all necessary laws to provide for the protection of livestock against the introduction or spread of pleuro-pneumonia, glanders, splenetic or Texas fever, and other infectious or contagious diseases. The legislature shall also establish a system of quarantine, or inspection, and such other regulations as may be necessary for the protection of stock owners, and most conducive to the stock interests within the state.

Cross references. —

For provisions relative to contagious and infectious diseases among livestock, see §§

11-19-101

to

11-19-407

.

Powers of state veterinarian. —

A statute giving certain powers to the state veterinarian in accordance with this section was not in violation of art. 2, § 1, Wyo. Const. and art. 3, § 1, Wyo. Const.Arbuckle v. Pflaeging, 20 Wyo. 351, 123 P. 918,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1912).

Dipping of sheep. —

Statute providing for compulsory dipping of all sheep kept or herded within the state, whether diseased or not, done under the supervision of an inspector and regulations of the state board, enacted under this section was a proper exercise of the police power, and not arbitrary in violation of art. 1, §§ 7 and 15, Wyo. Const., nor invalid as reposing judicial powers in an administrative officer contrary to art. 5, § 1, Wyo. Const.State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1920).

Statute requiring annual dipping of sheep was held not to take private property without due process of law or compensation. State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1920).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

For article, “Bison, Brucellosis, and Law in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1993).

For case note, “Wildlife — Private Property Damage Law — Once Upon a Time in Wyoming There was Room for Millions of Cattle and Enough Habitat for Every Species of Game to Find a Luxurious Existence. In the Aftermath of Parker, Can We All Still Get Along?
Parker Land and Cattle Company v. Wyoming Game and Fish Commission, 845 P.2d 1040,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1993),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 89 (1994).

Concerning Labor

§ 2. Day's work.

Eight (8) hours actual work shall constitute a lawful day's work in all mines, and on all state and municipal works.

Cross references. —

For another provision relative to protection of labor, see art. 1, § 22, Wyo. Const.

As to 8 hour day on public works, see §

16-6-110

.

As to hours of labor generally, see §§

27-5-101

to

27-5-110

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was numbered 1 in the enrolled constitution.

Street paving is public work. —

Contractor engaged in street paving for municipal corporation is doing public work as contemplated by this section, “public works,” being all fixed works constructed for public use. State v. A. H. Read Co., 33 Wyo. 387, 240 P. 208,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1925).

§ 3. Who shall not be employed on public works.

No person not a citizen of the United States or who has not declared his intention to become such, shall be employed upon or in connection with any state, county or municipal works or employment.

Cross references. —

For provision declaring contracts for alien labor void, see §

27-4-113

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was numbered 1 in the enrolled constitution.

Quoted

in

State ex rel. R.R. Crow & Co. v. Copenhaver, 64 Wyo. 1, 184 P.2d 594,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1947).

§ 4. Legislature to provide for enforcement of section 3.

The legislature shall, by appropriate legislation, see that the provisions of the foregoing section are enforced.

Editor's notes. —

This section was numbered 2 in the enrolled constitution.

Boards of Arbitration

[Repealed]

§ 5. Legislature to establish courts of arbitration; duties. [Repealed.]

Section repealed. —

This section was repealed by a constitutional amendment proposed by Laws 1965, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 518, adopted by a vote of the people on November 8, 1966, and proclaimed in effect January 17, 1967.

Police Powers

§ 6. Importing armed bodies to suppress violence prohibited; exception.

No armed police force, or detective agency, or armed body, or unarmed body of men, shall ever be brought into this state, for the suppression of domestic violence, except upon the application of the legislature, or executive, when the legislature cannot be convened.

Editor's notes. —

This section was numbered 1 in the enrolled constitution.

Labor Contracts

§ 7. Contract exempting employer from liability for personal injuries prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person, company or corporation, to require of its servants or employes [employees] as a condition of their employment, or otherwise, any contract or agreement whereby such person, company or corporation shall be released or discharged from liability or responsibility, on account of personal injuries received by such servants or employes [employees], while in the service of such person, company or corporation, by reason of the negligence of such person, company or corporation, or the agents or employes [employees] thereof, and such contracts shall be absolutely null and void.

Cross references. —

For provisions making contracts exempting employer from liability for death or injury of employee void, see art. 10, § 4, Wyo. Const., and §

27-1-105

.

For equivalent provision concerning railroads, see §

37-9-504

.

Agreement to submit disputes concerning injury and workers' compensation benefits to arbitration. —

Employee's agreement to submit disputes concerning injury and workers' compensation benefits to arbitration was not unenforceable under constitutional provision or statute, where there was no evidence that employer conditioned employment on employee's assent to any release of liability, and employer in fact accepted liability for employee's injuries through its workers' compensation plan. Gibson v. Wal-Mart Stores, Inc., 181 F.3d 1163, 1999 U.S. App. LEXIS 14114 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1999).

Quoted

in

Griess v. Consolidated Freightways Corp., 776 P.2d 752,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Boehm v. Cody Country Chamber of Commerce, 748 P.2d 704,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 569

(Wyo. 1987); Lesh v. Allstate Ins. Co., 723 F. Supp. 624, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12514 (D. Wyo. 1989); Blubaugh v. Turner, 842 P.2d 1072,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

For casenote, “Employment Discrimination — The After-Acquired Evidence Doctrine and its Effect on Recovery in Employment Discrimination Claims. McKennon v. Nashville Banner Publishing Co., 513 U.S. 352, 115 S. Ct. 879, 130 L. Ed. 2d 852, 1995 U.S. LEXIS 699 (1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 663 (1996).

Arbitration

§ 8. Legislature to provide for voluntary submission of differences to arbitrators.

The legislature may provide by law for the voluntary submission of differences to arbitrators for determination and said arbitrators shall have such powers and duties as may be prescribed by law; but they shall have no power to render judgment to be obligatory on parties; unless they voluntarily submit their matters of difference and agree to abide the judgment of such arbitrators.

Cross references. —

As to arbitration in justice of the peace courts, see §§

1-21-801

to

1-21-804

.

As to Uniform Arbitration Act, see §§

1-36-101

to

1-36-119

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was numbered 1 in the enrolled constitution.

Public policy. —

Arbitration as a mode for voluntary final settlement of disputes in an inexpensive and expeditious manner without resort to a tribunal, conducted with rigid formality under strict rules of law, has long been embedded in the public policy of this state. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

There is no direct constitutional requirement for appeal from an award

in voluntary arbitration. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

And the right to appeal does not exist unless expressly conferred by statute.

In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Sections

27-10-101

to

27-10-109

, pertaining to collective bargaining for fire fighters,

do not violate this section.
State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Arbitration — Jurisdiction from Participation. Hot Springs County Sch. Dist. v. Strube Constr. Co., 715 P.2d 540,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 183 (1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Arbitration of medical malpractice claims, 84 ALR3d 375.

Homesteads

§ 9. Exemption of homestead.

A homestead as provided by law shall be exempt from forced sale under any process of law, and shall not be alienated without the joint consent of husband and wife, when that relation exists; but no property shall be exempt from sale for taxes, or for the payment of obligations contracted for the purchase of said premises, or for the erection of improvements thereon.

Cross references. —

As to property exempt from execution or attachment, see ch. 20 of title 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section was numbered 1 in the enrolled constitution.

Meaning of “homestead.” —

The “homestead” mentioned in the constitution is “a homestead as provided by law.” Jones v. Losekamp, 19 Wyo. 83, 114 P. 673,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1911).

Homestead right does not extend to land of greater value than fixed by statute.

Jones v. Losekamp, 19 Wyo. 83, 114 P. 673,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1911).

Conveyance without consent not void as to amount over $4,000. —

A deed by the owner without the consent of his or her spouse, conveying property embracing a homestead but of a value in excess of $4,000, is not void as to the excess. Stolldorf v. Stolldorf, 384 P.2d 969,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1963).

Sale of homestead. —

District court can hear and determine claim by owner for share of proceeds of homestead after the expiration of term at which sale was confirmed. Altman v. District Court of Second Judicial Dist., 36 Wyo. 290, 254 P. 691,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1927).

Transfer of certificate of purchase of homestead property, issued by sheriff, goes only to question as to who is proper or necessary party to hearing on motion by homestead claimant for part of proceeds. Altman v. District Court of Second Judicial Dist., 36 Wyo. 290, 254 P. 691,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1927).

Conveyed property not within bankruptcy estate. —

Denial of a debtor's homestead exemption claim under 11 U.S.C.S. § 522 was affirmed because property that had been conveyed to her husband prior to her bankruptcy filing was not within the debtor's bankruptcy estate under 11 U.S.C.S. § 541 since Wyo. Const. Art. 19, § 9 and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-20-101

do not create a legal or equitable interest in the property sufficient to independently support a bankruptcy exemption, and because neither the debtor nor her husband owned or were entitled to own the claimed homestead property when the debtor filed for bankruptcy protection, Wyo. Stat. Ann. 1-20-102(a) did not allow a homestead exemption for the property. Hart v. Crawford (In re Hart), 332 B.R. 439, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 23595 (D. Wyo. 2005).

Lease held ineffective. —

A lease on a homestead naming the husband only as lessor, though signed and acknowledged by the wife also, which contained no express release of homestead in the body of the instrument, and no clause as to such release in the acknowledgment, was ineffective as to the homestead. Jones v. Losekamp, 19 Wyo. 83, 114 P. 673,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1911).

Mortgage held good. —

A mortgage by the husband alone on a homestead to secure release of a judgment on a mechanic's lien for improvements is good. Wright v. Walker, 31 Wyo. 233, 225 P. 75,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1924).

Purchase-money mortgage. —

Where mortgage for purchase-money has been given at time of purchase, a change in security or substitution of new mortgage does not affect the rule in equity giving to purchase-money mortgage precedence over the homestead right of mortgagor, although the new mortgage is executed to a third party for money advanced to pay off original mortgage. Powers v. Pense, 20 Wyo. 327, 123 P. 925,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1912).

No attachment of nonpurchase-money lien absent waiver. —

A consensual, but nonpurchase-money, lien does not attach to the first $10,000 in value of a debtor's homestead unless it is accompanied by an informed, voluntary and specific waiver of the homestead exemption. In re VanGorp, 128 B.R. 579, 1991 Bankr. LEXIS 881 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1991).

Divorce actions. —

Jurisdiction of divorce action obtained by publication authorizes court to dispose of homestead within the state. Closson v. Closson, 30 Wyo. 1, 215 P. 485,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1923).

Wife's separate property. —

A woman, against whom personal judgment was rendered, though judgment was also against her husband, is entitled to homestead exemption in her separate property, on which she lived with her husband. Bachmann v. Hurtt, 26 Wyo. 332, 184 P. 709,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1919).

Tenant in common cannot establish homestead right as against interests of other cotenants. —

Tenants in common had equal right of possession and one cotenant could not establish a homestead right as against the interests of the other cotenants. The fact that the land in question was once the homestead of the father of the parties and that a patent was issued to him did not prevent partitioning among his heirs. Osborn v. Warner, 694 P.2d 730,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1985).

Purchase money security interests possess priority. —

Purchase money security interests in personal property, as well as real property, have priority over a debtor's homestead exemption. Geist v. Converse County Bank, 79 B.R. 939, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10402 (D. Wyo. 1987).

Applied

in

Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Quoted

in

McConnell v. Dixon, 68 Wyo. 301, 233 P.2d 877,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(1951).

Law reviews. —

For note on homestead exemption in Wyoming, see 16 Wyo. L.J. 81 (1961).

For note, “Should Marital Rights Be Protected by Statute?,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 14 (1964).

For article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Recovery of damages for breach of contract to convey homestead where only one spouse signed contract, 5 ALR4th 1310.

Lien of judgment on excess value of homestead, 41 ALR4th 292.

Intoxicating Liquors

§ 10. Intoxicating liquors.

On and after the first day of March, 1935, the manufacture, sale and keeping for sale of malt, vinous or spirituous liquors, wine, ale, porter, beer or any intoxicating drink, mixture or preparation of like nature may be permitted in the State of Wyoming under such regulation as the legislature may prescribe. (As added by laws 1917, ch. 2; as amended by Laws 1933, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 178.)

Cross references. —

As to regulation of alcoholic beverages generally, see title 12.

History. —

Laws 1917, ch. 2, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment to the constitution adding to this article a section under the head of “Intoxicating Liquors,” to be known as § 1. It was the prohibition amendment. The amendment was adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 4, 1918, and was proclaimed in effect December 3, 1918.

Laws 1933, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 178, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment to take the place of the new section added in 1918. This amendment which repealed prohibition, was adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 6, 1934, and was proclaimed in effect December 1, 1934.

Stated

in

Biscar v. University of Wyo. Bd. of Trustees, 605 P.2d 374,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 11. Use of monies in public employee retirement funds restricted.

All monies from any source paid into any public employee retirement system created by the laws of this state shall be used only for the benefit of the members, retirees and beneficiaries of that system, including the payment of system administrative costs. (As added by Laws 1990, House Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 375.)